Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-162.02
State Forester; powers.

Subject to the general direction of the Board of Regents, the State Forester shall (1) administer tree distribution programs, (2) develop and implement plans for the prevention and suppression of forest, brush and grassland fires on both public and private lands, (3) develop and implement plans for flood control and soil erosion work on forest lands of the state, (4) develop and implement plans for the protection of forest resources on both public and private lands from insect, disease and other natural pests, (5) carry on technical assistance programs with forest landowners, including growing, harvesting and marketing of wood products, (6) carry on technical assistance programs with forest product processors in the production, utilization and marketing of wood products, including but not limited to forest surveys, feasibility studies, management and marketing clinics, and (7) carry on educational programs in all phases of forestry in the state.

Laws 1967, c. 585, § 2, p. 1974;

R.S.1943, (1981), § 85-163.03.